District of Columbia statutes.
1-204.107

Adoption of acts to carry out subpart.

The Council of the District of Columbia shall adopt such acts as are necessary to carry out the purpose of this subpart within 180 days of the effective date of this subpart. Neither a petition initiating an initiative nor a referendum may be presented to the District of Columbia Board of Elections and Ethics prior to October 1, 1978.

History

Mar. 10, 1978, D.C. Law 2-46, § 2, 24 DCR 199
Oct. 27, 1978, 92 Stat. 2023, Pub. L. 95-526

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-287.
1973 Ed., § 1-187.